Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1198.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Sections 41-3026.02 and 41-3026.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, are repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 41-3034.02 and 41-3034.03, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.02. Arizona state veterinary medical examining board; termination July 1, 2034 A. The Arizona state veterinary medical examining board terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 32, chapter 21 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-3034.03. Arizona beef council; termination July 1, 2034 A. The Arizona beef council terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 3, chapter 11, article 2 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board to promote the safe and professional practice of veterinary medicine. Sec. 4. Purpose Pursuant to section 412955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona beef council as a self-financed program to help market, develop, maintain and expand the state, national and foreign markets for beef and beef products produced, processed or manufactured in this state. Sec. 5. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.